Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1593
Radioactive material, defined.

Radioactive material shall mean any material, solid, liquid, or gas, which emits ionizing radiation spontaneously. Radioactive material shall include accelerator-produced, byproduct, naturally occurring, source, and special nuclear materials.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 16.